Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 4

Secretary of State

48-51-401. Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the secretary of state by chapters 51-68 of this title, including, without limitation, the power to promulgate necessary and appropriate rules and regulations consistent with chapters 51-68 of this title, and the power to destroy any records in the secretary of state's office concerning the domestic or foreign corporation ten (10) years after such corporation has dissolved, withdrawn from the state, or has had its certificate of authority revoked.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.40.

Cross-References. Monthly list of newly licensed corporations, § 8-3-104.

48-51-402. Deputies of secretary of state.

An act of a duly authorized deputy of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf under chapters 51-68 of this title is the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state; provided, that the name of the secretary of state is signed by such deputy as deputy.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.41.